California, session 20252026, AB944.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8596.1 is added to the Government Code, to read:8596.1. (a) During a state of war emergency or a state of emergency, a nonprofit entity that provides services pursuant to a contract with a state agency may request the state agency to allow that nonprofit to modify the method in which it provides those services so long as the purpose of the contract is served. The nonprofit entity shall not exceed the contract budget unless the nonprofit entity and the state agency enter into an agreement for modification. If the state agency agrees to that modification, the state agency and nonprofit entity shall prepare and sign an addendum to the contract establishing the terms and conditions of the modification.(b) The nonprofit entity shall notify each state agency from which it receives funding of a closure or of an impacted program, including whether a closure is location specific or due to executive order, and why the service level may be impacted.(c) (1) The nonprofit entity shall identify and thoroughly document all expenditures associated with the closed program. The nonprofit entity shall retain documentation to justify expenses and to support claiming continued state funding in accordance with the following requirements:(A) Fixed and regular costs that continue to be incurred shall be paid normally.(B) Hourly employees, including those who would not otherwise be paid when a program is not operating, shall be paid the anticipated wage during the closure.(C) If there are any expenses that will not be incurred due to a program closure, those expenses shall be identified and excluded from invoicing. If the costs occurred prior to the closure, those costs shall be paid by the contracting state agency.(2) While contract expenditures may be billed using a regular monthly invoice template, the expenses related to a closure shall be documented and provided separately to the state agency.(A) A nonprofit entity with a cost reimbursement contract shall invoice for the month, but shall be flexible and responsive to the applicable state agency’s requests for additional documentation about expenditures during closure, which may include documentation of specific services that were expected but unable to be delivered, and costs associated with those services.(B) A nonprofit entity with a fee-for-service contract shall invoice for the month by calculating one-twelfth of the contracted units of service, and shall provide documentation of specific services that were expected but unable to be delivered.(d) A state agency that receives notification from a nonprofit entity pursuant to subdivision (b) shall ensure that funding is available to pay for canceled services, closed programs, or reduced service levels.(e) When a disruption occurs that prohibits a nonprofit entity from providing services pursuant to a contract with a state agency, but a state of emergency or a state of war emergency is not declared, the nonprofit entity may submit to the impacted state agency for approval a written request for flexibility with respect to services and funding pursuant to the contract. The state agency may approve the written request if it determines that doing so is reasonable under the circumstances described by the nonprofit agency.